Indiana, session 2026, SB72.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section applies to a state employee
health plan that is established, entered into, amended, or renewed
after June 30, 2026.
(a) (b) As used in this section, "covered individual" means an
individual who is entitled to coverage under a state employee health
plan.
(b) (c) As used in this section, "orthotic device" means a medically
necessary custom fabricated brace or support that is designed as a
component of a prosthetic device.
(c) (d) As used in this section, "prosthetic device" means an
artificial leg or arm.
(d) (e) As used in this section, "state employee health plan" means
a:
(1) self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of this
chapter; or
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


(2) contract with a prepaid health care delivery plan that is
entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter;
to provide group health coverage. The term does not include a dental
or vision plan.
(e) (f) A state employee health plan must provide coverage for the
following:
(1) An orthotic devices and device or a prosthetic devices,
including repairs or replacements, device that is determined by
the covered individual's provider to be the most appropriate
model that adequately meets the medical needs of the covered
individual.
(1) are provided or performed by a person that is:
(A) accredited as required under 42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(20); or
(B) a qualified practitioner (as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395m(h)(1)(F)(iii));
(2) are An orthotic device or a prosthetic device that is
determined by the covered individual's physician provider to be
medically necessary to restore or maintain the covered
individual's ability to perform activities of daily living or essential
job related activities; and the most appropriate model that
meets the medical needs of the covered individual for
purposes of:
(A) performing physical activities, as applicable, such as
running, biking, swimming, and strength training; and
(B) maximizing the covered individual's whole body health
and lower or upper limb function.
(3) are not solely for comfort or convenience. An orthotic device
or a prosthetic device that is determined by the covered
individual's provider to be the most appropriate model that
meets the medical needs of the covered individual for
purposes of showering or bathing.
(4) All materials and components necessary to use the orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(5) Instruction to the covered individual on using the orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(6) The medically necessary repair or replacement of the
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices described in
subdivisions (1) through (3).
(g) With respect to a covered individual who receives an
orthotic device or a prosthetic device under subsection (f)(1),
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


coverage of an additional orthotic device or prosthetic device
under subsection (f)(2) or (f)(3) must require the covered
individual's treating physician to determine that the additional
orthotic device or prosthetic device under subsection (f)(2) or (f)(3)
is necessary to enable the covered individual to engage in the
activities described in subsection (f)(2) or (f)(3).
(f) (h) The:
(1) coverage required under subsection (e) (f) must be equal to
the coverage that is provided for the same device, repair, or
replacement under the federal Medicare program (42 U.S.C. 1395
et seq.) and the regulations under 42 CFR 410.100, 42 CFR
414.202, 42 CFR 414.210, and 42 CFR 414.228; and
(2) reimbursement under the coverage required under subsection
(e) (f) must be equal to the reimbursement that is provided for the
same device, repair, or replacement under the federal Medicare
reimbursement schedule, unless a different reimbursement rate is
negotiated.
This subsection does not require a deductible under a state employee
health plan to be equal to a deductible under the federal Medicare
program.
(g) (i) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i), subsection (k),
the coverage required under subsection (e): (f):
(1) may be subject to; and
(2) may not be more restrictive than;
the provisions that apply to other benefits under the state employee
health plan.
(j) A state employee health plan shall consider the coverage
required under subsection (f) to be habilitative or rehabilitative
benefits for purposes of any state or federal requirement for
coverage of essential health benefits.
(h) (k) The coverage required under subsection (e) (f) may be
subject to utilization review, including periodic review, of the
continued medical necessity of the benefit. A state employee health
plan:
(1) shall render utilization review determinations in a
nondiscriminatory manner; and
(2) may not deny coverage for habilitative or rehabilitative
benefits, including orthotic devices or prosthetic devices,
solely on the basis of a covered individual's actual or
perceived disability.
(l) A state employee health plan may not deny coverage for an
orthotic device or a prosthetic device for a covered individual with
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


limb loss or absence that would otherwise be covered for a covered
individual without a disability who seeks medical or surgical
intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same
physical activity.
(m) A state employee health plan shall include language
describing a covered individual's rights under subsections (k) and
(l) in the state employee health plan's evidence of coverage and any
denial letters.
(n) A state employee health plan shall ensure that covered
individuals have access to medically necessary clinical care and
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices from at least two (2) distinct
orthotic device and prosthetic device providers in the state
employee health plan's network. If medically necessary orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices are not available from an in network
provider, the state employee health plan shall:
(1) provide processes to refer a covered individual to an out
of network provider; and
(2) fully reimburse the out of network provider at a mutually
agreed upon rate reduced by the covered individual's cost
sharing determined on an in network basis.
(o) If a state employee health plan provides coverage for an
orthotic device or prosthetic device, the state employee health plan
shall provide coverage for the replacement of the orthotic device,
the prosthetic device, or any part of the orthotic device or
prosthetic device without regard to continuous use or useful
lifetime restrictions if an ordering provider determines that the
replacement device or part is necessary because of any of the
following:
(1) A change in the physiological condition of the covered
individual.
(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or
part.
(3) The condition of the device or part requires repairs and
the cost of the repairs would be more than sixty percent
(60%) of the cost of a replacement device or part.
The state employee health plan may require confirmation from a
prescribing provider if the device or part that is being replaced is
less than three (3) years old.
(i) Any lifetime maximum coverage limitation that applies to
prosthetic devices and orthotic devices:
(1) must not be included in; and
(2) must be equal to;
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


the lifetime maximum coverage limitation that applies to all other items
and services generally under the state employee health plan.
(j) (p) For purposes of this subsection, "items and services" does not
include preventive services for which coverage is provided under a
high deductible health plan (as defined in 26 U.S.C. 220(c)(2) or 26
U.S.C. 223(c)(2)). The coverage required under subsection (e) (f) may
not be subject to a deductible, copayment, or coinsurance provision that
is less favorable to a covered individual than the deductible,
copayment, or coinsurance provisions that apply to other items and
services generally under the state employee health plan.
(q) Not later than October 1, 2027, the state personnel
department shall submit a report to the insurance commissioner
regarding a state employee's health plan coverage of orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices. The report must:
(1) be on a form prescribed by the insurance commissioner;
and
(2) include the total number of claims and the total amount of
claims paid for the services required under subsection (f)
during the preceding plan year.
This subsection expires June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2. IC 27-1-3-35.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 35.5. (a) The commissioner shall aggregate the data
received under:
(1) IC 5-10-8-14;
(2) IC 27-8-24.2-11; and
(3) IC 27-13-7-19.
(b) Not later than December 1, 2027, the commissioner shall
submit a report regarding the aggregated data under subsection (a)
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the standing committees
of the house of representatives and the senate that consider
insurance matters.
(c) This section expires June 30, 2028.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-24.2-0.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 450, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.1. The addition of This chapter by
P.L.109-2008 applies to a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2008.
2026.
SECTION 4. IC 27-8-24.2-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A policy of accident and sickness insurance
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


must provide coverage for the following:
(1) An orthotic devices and device or a prosthetic devices,
including repairs or replacements, device that is determined by
the insured's provider to be the most appropriate model that
adequately meets the medical needs of the insured.
(1) are provided or performed by a person that is:
(A) accredited as required under 42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(20); or
(B) a qualified practitioner (as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395m(h)(1)(F)(iii));
(2) are An orthotic device or a prosthetic device that is
determined by the insured's physician provider to be medically
necessary to restore or maintain the insured's ability to perform
activities of daily living or essential job related activities; and the
most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the
insured for purposes of:
(A) performing physical activities, as applicable, such as
running, biking, swimming, and strength training; and
(B) maximizing the insured's whole body health and lower
or upper limb function.
(3) are not solely for comfort or convenience. An orthotic device
or a prosthetic device that is determined by the insured's
provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the
medical needs of the insured for purposes of showering or
bathing.
(4) All materials and components necessary to use the orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(5) Instruction to the insured on using the orthotic devices and
prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1) through (3).
(6) The medically necessary repair or replacement of the
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices described in
subdivisions (1) through (3).
SECTION 5. IC 27-8-24.2-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. With respect to an insured
who receives an orthotic device or a prosthetic device under section
5(1) of this chapter, coverage of an additional orthotic device or
prosthetic device under section 5(2) or 5(3) of this chapter must
require the insured's treating physician to determine that the
additional orthotic device or prosthetic device under section 5(2)
or 5(3) of this chapter is necessary to enable the insured to engage
in the activities described in section 5(2) or 5(3) of this chapter.
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


SECTION 6. IC 27-8-24.2-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The:
(1) coverage required under section 5 of this chapter must be
equal to the coverage that is provided for the same device, repair,
or replacement under the federal Medicare program (42 U.S.C.
1395 et seq.) and the regulations under 42 CFR 410.100, 42
CFR 414.202, 42 CFR 414.210, and 42 CFR 414.228; and
(2) reimbursement under the coverage required under section 5 of
this chapter must be equal to the reimbursement that is provided
for the same device, repair, or replacement under the federal
Medicare reimbursement schedule, unless a different
reimbursement rate is negotiated.
This section does not require a deductible under a policy of accident
and sickness insurance to be equal to a deductible under the federal
Medicare program.
SECTION 7. IC 27-8-24.2-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Except as provided in sections section 8 and 9
of this chapter, the coverage required under section 5 of this chapter:
(1) may be subject to; and
(2) may not be more restrictive than;
the provisions that apply to other benefits under the policy of accident
and sickness insurance.
SECTION 8. IC 27-8-24.2-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. A policy of accident and
sickness insurance shall consider the coverage required under
section 5 of this chapter to be habilitative or rehabilitative benefits
for purposes of any state or federal requirement for coverage of
essential health benefits.
SECTION 9. IC 27-8-24.2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The coverage required under section 5 of
this chapter may be subject to utilization review, including periodic
review, of the continued medical necessity of the benefit.
(b) A policy of accident and sickness insurance:
(1) shall render utilization review determinations in a
nondiscriminatory manner; and
(2) may not deny coverage for habilitative or rehabilitative
benefits, including orthotic devices or prosthetic devices,
solely on the basis of an insured's actual or perceived
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


disability.
SECTION 10. IC 27-8-24.2-8.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.3. A policy of accident and
sickness insurance may not deny coverage for an orthotic device or
a prosthetic device for an insured with limb loss or absence that
would otherwise be covered for an insured without a disability who
seeks medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain the
ability to perform the same physical activity.
SECTION 11. IC 27-8-24.2-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. A policy of accident and
sickness insurance shall include language describing an insured's
rights under sections 8 and 8.3 of this chapter in the policy of
accident and sickness insurance's evidence of coverage and any
denial letters.
SECTION 12. IC 27-8-24.2-8.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.7. A policy of accident and
sickness insurance shall ensure that insureds have access to
medically necessary clinical care and orthotic devices and
prosthetic devices from at least two (2) distinct orthotic device and
prosthetic device providers in the policy of accident and sickness
insurance's network. If medically necessary orthotic devices and
prosthetic devices are not available from an in network provider,
the policy of accident and sickness insurance shall:
(1) provide processes to refer an insured to an out of network
provider; and
(2) fully reimburse the out of network provider at a mutually
agreed upon rate reduced by the insured's cost sharing
determined on an in network basis.
SECTION 13. IC 27-8-24.2-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. Any lifetime maximum coverage limitation that
applies to prosthetic devices and orthotic devices:
(1) must not be included in; and
(2) must be equal to;
the lifetime maximum coverage limitation that applies to all other items
and services generally under the policy of accident and sickness
insurance.
SECTION 14. IC 27-8-24.2-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. If a policy of accident and
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


sickness insurance provides coverage for an orthotic device or
prosthetic device, the policy of accident and sickness insurance
shall provide coverage for the replacement of the orthotic device,
the prosthetic device, or any part of the orthotic device or
prosthetic device without regard to continuous use or useful
lifetime restrictions if an ordering provider determines that the
replacement device or part is necessary because of any of the
following:
(1) A change in the physiological condition of the insured.
(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or
part.
(3) The condition of the device or part requires repairs and
the cost of the repairs would be more than sixty percent
(60%) of the cost of a replacement device or part.
The policy of accident and sickness insurance may require
confirmation from a prescribing provider if the device or part that
is being replaced is less than three (3) years old.
SECTION 15. IC 27-8-24.2-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Not later than October 1,
2027, an insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance shall submit a report to the commissioner regarding the
policy of accident and sickness insurance's coverage of orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices. The report must:
(1) be on a form prescribed by the commissioner; and
(2) include the total number of claims and the total amount of
claims paid for the services required under section 5 of this
chapter during the preceding plan year.
(b) This section expires June 30, 2028.
SECTION 16. IC 27-13-7-19, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2008,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) This section applies to an individual
contract and a group contract that is entered into, delivered,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(a) (b) As used in this section, "orthotic device" means a medically
necessary custom fabricated brace or support that is designed as a
component of a prosthetic device.
(b) (c) As used in this section, "prosthetic device" means an
artificial leg or arm.
(c) (d) An individual contract or a group contract that provides
coverage for basic health care services must provide coverage for the
following:
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


(1) An orthotic devices and device or a prosthetic devices,
including repairs or replacements, device that is determined by
the enrollee's provider to be the most appropriate model that
adequately meets the medical needs of the enrollee.
(1) are provided or performed by a person that is:
(A) accredited as required under 42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(20); or
(B) a qualified practitioner (as defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395m(h)(1)(F)(iii));
(2) are An orthotic device or a prosthetic device that is
determined by the enrollee's physician provider to be medically
necessary to restore or maintain the enrollee's ability to perform
activities of daily living or essential job related activities; and the
most appropriate model that meets the medical needs of the
enrollee for purposes of:
(A) performing physical activities, as applicable, such as
running, biking, swimming, and strength training; and
(B) maximizing the enrollee's whole body health and lower
or upper limb function.
(3) are not solely for comfort or convenience. An orthotic device
or a prosthetic device that is determined by the enrollee's
provider to be the most appropriate model that meets the
medical needs of the enrollee for purposes of showering or
bathing.
(4) All materials and components necessary to use the orthotic
devices and prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(5) Instruction to the enrollee on using the orthotic devices
and prosthetic devices described in subdivisions (1) through
(3).
(6) The medically necessary repair or replacement of the
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices described in
subdivisions (1) through (3).
(e) With respect to an enrollee who receives an orthotic device
or a prosthetic device under subsection (d)(1), coverage of an
additional orthotic device or prosthetic device under subsection
(d)(2) or (d)(3) must require the enrollee's treating physician to
determine that the additional orthotic device or prosthetic device
under subsection (d)(2) or (d)(3) is necessary to enable the enrollee
to engage in the activities described in subsection (d)(2) or (d)(3).
(d) (f) The:
(1) coverage required under subsection (c) (d) must be equal to
the coverage that is provided for the same device, repair, or
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


replacement under the federal Medicare program (42 U.S.C. 1395
et seq.) and the regulations under 42 CFR 410.100, 42 CFR
414.202, 42 CFR 414.210, and 42 CFR 414.228; and
(2) reimbursement under the coverage required under subsection
(c) (d) must be equal to the reimbursement that is provided for the
same device, repair, or replacement under the federal Medicare
reimbursement schedule, unless a different reimbursement rate is
negotiated.
This subsection does not require a deductible under an individual
contract or a group contract to be equal to a deductible under the
federal Medicare program.
(e) (g) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g), subsection (i),
the coverage required under subsection (c): (d):
(1) may be subject to; and
(2) may not be more restrictive than;
the provisions that apply to other benefits under the individual contract
or group contract.
(h) An individual contract or a group contract shall consider the
coverage required under subsection (d) to be habilitative or
rehabilitative benefits for purposes of any state or federal
requirement for coverage of essential health benefits.
(f) (i) The coverage required under subsection (c) (d) may be
subject to utilization review, including periodic review, of the
continued medical necessity of the benefit. An individual contract or
a group contract:
(1) shall render utilization review determinations in a
nondiscriminatory manner; and
(2) may not deny coverage for habilitative or rehabilitative
benefits, including orthotic devices or prosthetic devices,
solely on the basis of an enrollee's actual or perceived
disability.
(j) An individual contract or a group contract may not deny
coverage for an orthotic device or a prosthetic device for an
enrollee with limb loss or absence that would otherwise be covered
for an enrollee without a disability who seeks medical or surgical
intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same
physical activity.
(k) An individual contract or a group contract shall include
language describing an enrollee's rights under subsections (i) and
(j) in the individual contract or group contract's evidence of
coverage and any denial letters.
(l) An individual contract or a group contract shall ensure that
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


enrollees have access to medically necessary clinical care and
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices from at least two (2) distinct
orthotic device and prosthetic device providers in the individual
contract or group contract's network. If medically necessary
orthotic devices and prosthetic devices are not available from an
in network provider, the individual contract or group contract
shall:
(1) provide processes to refer an enrollee to an out of network
provider; and
(2) fully reimburse the out of network provider at a mutually
agreed upon rate reduced by the enrollee's cost sharing
determined on an in network basis.
(m) If an individual contract or a group contract provides
coverage for an orthotic device or prosthetic device, the individual
contract or group contract shall provide coverage for the
replacement of the orthotic device, the prosthetic device, or any
part of the orthotic device or prosthetic device without regard to
continuous use or useful lifetime restrictions if an ordering
provider determines that the replacement device or part is
necessary because of any of the following:
(1) A change in the physiological condition of the enrollee.
(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or
part.
(3) The condition of the device or part requires repairs and
the cost of the repairs would be more than sixty percent
(60%) of the cost of a replacement device or part.
The individual contract or group contract may require
confirmation from a prescribing provider if the device or part that
is being replaced is less than three (3) years old.
(g) Any lifetime maximum coverage limitation that applies to
prosthetic devices and orthotic devices:
(1) must not be included in; and
(2) must be equal to;
the lifetime maximum coverage limitation that applies to all other items
and services generally under the individual contract or group contract.
(h) (n) For purposes of this subsection, "items and services" does
not include preventive services for which coverage is provided under
a high deductible health plan (as defined in 26 U.S.C. 220(c)(2) or 26
U.S.C. 223(c)(2)). The coverage required under subsection (c) (d) may
not be subject to a deductible, copayment, or coinsurance provision that
is less favorable to an enrollee than the deductible, copayment, or
coinsurance provisions that apply to other items and services generally
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141


under the individual contract or group contract.
(o) Not later than October 1, 2027, a health maintenance
organization that enters into an individual contract or a group
contract that provides coverage for basic health care services shall
submit a report to the commissioner regarding the individual
contract or group contract's coverage of orthotic devices and
prosthetic devices. The report must:
(1) be on a form prescribed by the commissioner; and
(2) include the total number of claims and the total amount of
claims paid for the services required under subsection (d)
during the preceding plan year.
This subsection expires June 30, 2028.
2026 IN 72—LS 6216/DI 141